better-hyphenation.dic
.kahek1sa1teist1küm1ne1aas1ta1seks.
.kahek1sa1teist1küm1ne1aas1ta1sel.
.pii1ma1man1ner1gu1pee1gel1dus1tes.
.kahek1sa1teist1küm1ne1aas1tase.
.tem1pe1ra1tuu1ri1tund1lik1kuse.
.batist1tas1ku1rä1ti1ku1kest.
.järel1mak1su1või1ma1lu1sega.
.lehe1var1ju1must1ri1lis1tel.
.südant1soo1jen1da1va1maid.
.tähe1le1pa1nu1aval1du1sest.
.ravim1tai1me1ar1se1na1liga.
.šam1pan1ja1kok1ku1os1tust.
.Sep1temb1ri1hom1mi1ku1tel.
.Ise1ene1sest1mõis1te1tav.
.maa1il1ma1loo1mi1se1plaan.
.Rah1va1kuns1ti1an1sambli.
.vana1ini1me1se1pi1sa1raid.
.vehk1le1mis1va1rus1tust.
.viker1kaa1re1vär1vi1des.
.mui1nas1ju1tu1maa1il1mas.
.kort1su1de1rä1gas1tikku.
.šam1pan1ja1pu1de1li1test.
.süda1me1tun1nis1tu1sega.
.kin1ga1po1lee1ri1mi1sest.
.roo1si1nu1pu1must1riga.
.aukar1tust1ära1ta1vad.
.võõ1ras1te1ma1ja1nurka.
.vahu1vei1ni1au1ru1dest.
.kris1tall1kin1ga1kesi.
.illust1rat1sioo1nide.
.eba1õn1nes1tu1mis1test.
.taga1si1hoid1li1ku1mat.
.ära1tund1mis1rõõ1must.
.polee1ri1mis1har1jaga.
.südant1lõ1hes1ta1valt.
.polee1ri1mis1nõusse.
.köö1gi1vil1ja1ae1dade.
.vahe1tus1kau1pa1dest.
.ene1ses1se1pöö1ra1tud.
.õhu1los1si1ar1hi1tekt.
.kor1ra1pä1ra1se1ma1tes.
.joo1gi1kop1si1ku1tega.
.eba1isi1ku1pä1ra1sema.
.õukon1na1kal1li1kesi.
.kõr1ges1ti1sün1di1nud.
.nel1ja1teist1küm1met.
.aas1ta1te1pik1ku1sest.
.vahe1le1se1ga1mi1sest.
.enne1kuul1ma1tu1test.
.unel1ma1ser1vii1sist.
.viis1teist1küm1mend.
.lõu1na1maa1saar1test.
.šam1pan1ja1ko1gu1sest.
.kõr1va1le1hii1li1mist.
.käsi1töö1li1se1pihku.
.loit1su1ni1me1kir1jas.
.kam1mer1neit1si1teni.
.hir1mu1va1lit1su1sest.
.rii1gi1va1lit1se1mist.
.kanar1bi1ku1lil1laks.
.pii1ma1hõn1gu1li1sele.
.kõr1vu1lu1kus1ta1valt.
.tal1ve1kar1di1na1test.
.põe1ta1mis1os1ku1sega.
.tähe1le1pa1nu1väärne.
.ise1ene1sest1mõista.
.suu1re1joo1ne1lis1tes.
.satiin1kin1ga1ke1sed.
.väl1ja1suu1na1ta1vate.
.har1ju1mus1pä1ra1selt.
.lähe1dal1seis1vast.
.süda1me1tun1nis1tus.
.polee1ri1mis1kalts.
.rüüt1li1väl1ja1õppe.
.regist1ree1ri1mise.
.täis1kuu1nae1ra1tus.
.suht1lus1va1hen1did.
.vei1ni1laa1dun1gite.
.jär1je1kind1lu1sega.
.tegut1se1mis1tahte.
.suu1ren1dus1klaasi.
.mee1le1kind1lu1sest.
.alus1see1li1ku1serv.
.kan1nat1lik1ku1sega.
.vara1hom1mi1ku1selt.
.südant1lõ1hes1tava.
.hee1rin1ga1tün1nide.
.käe1ga1kat1su1ta1vas.
.väl1ja1ja1ga1mi1sega.
.kur1ja1kuu1lu1ta1vat.
.käe1ga1kat1su1ta1vat.
.vei1ni1saa1de1tiste.
.ins1pi1rat1sioo1nil.
.met1sa1sü1ga1vus1tes.
.bal1li1klei1ti1dest.
.kul1bi1lii1gu1ta1jat.
.vik1si1at1ri1buu1did.
.sil1ma1nur1ka1desse.
.kait1se1mär1ki1dega.
.mand1ri1sü1ga1vu1ses.
.võlts1ju1vee1lidki.
.tee1le1saat1mi1sele.
.põran1da1lau1da1del.
.maa1de1avas1ta1jaks.
.Kala1vints1ki1mees.
.roo1si1nu1pu1li1sest.
.kujut1lus1või1mest.
.met1sa1sü1ga1vu1sest.
.paha1mee1le1po1bina.
.pal1ju1kan1na1ta1nud.
.rüüt1li1kuns1ti1des.
.õukon1na1or1kes1ter.
.sen1ti1men1taal1ses.
.kir1sa1saa1bas1tega.
.päi1ke1se1val1gu1ses.
.pil1ku1püüd1va1maks.
.maa1il1ma1tun1ne1tus.
.näda1la1va1he1tu1sel.
.mee1le1kind1lu1sega.
.ene1se1avas1ta1mise.
.müü1ri1rin1na1ti1sel.
.vih1ma1vee1tün1nide.
.eksi1rän1na1ku1telt.
.tähen1dus1kül1last.
.Meel1te1se1ga1su1ses.
.uudis1hi1mu1li1kult.
.novemb1ri1tor1mide.
.Nais1üli1õpi1laste.
.pere1kon1na1mõisa.
.hir1mu1va1lit1suse.
.hõbe1bro1kaa1dist.
.hin1ge1tõm1me1test.
.väl1jen1da1va1test.
.Kahet1sus1väärse.
.lil1le1nup1pu1dele.
.samet1pat1ja1dele.
.klaa1si1kli1ri1nat.
.ootus1äre1vu1sega.
.hir1mu1ära1ta1vaid.
.päi1ke1se1lõõ1sast.
.pime1du1se1mantli.
.tõl1la1sü1ga1vusse.
.saa1te1muu1si1kaks.
.pro1tes1tee1ri1des.
.aka1dee1mia1tesse.
.samet1polst1riga.
.mure1il1me1li1seks.
.ümmar1da1ja1te1väe.
.argi1päe1va1mu1red.
.Lõh1ku1mis1rõõ1mus.
.kuns1ti1teos1test.
.sada1ma1kõrt1sist.
.tant1su1põ1ran1dat.
.kal1lis1as1ja1delt.
.pala1vi1ku1li1selt.
.Sel1le1gi1poo1lest.
.päi1ke1se1val1guse.
.kõr1valt1vaa1taja.
.sega1dus1se1ae1tud.
.ära1kort1su1ta1tud.
.kin1ga1kree1miste.
.ilma1val1gus1taja.
.pal1gi1va1he1desse.
.vasak1pool1sesse.
.kohal1vii1bi1jate.
.õukon1na1juuk1sur.
.haja1meel1se1maks.
.unel1ma1pu1de1list.
.taga1si1nõud1mise.
.rahul1ole1ma1tust.
.ämb1li1ku1võr1kude.
.print1ses1si1dest.
.vär1vi1kir1me1tist.
.kali1fee1püks1tes.
.käte1puu1du1tusse.
.eba1loo1mu1li1kult.
.bal1li1saa1li1dest.
.klaa1si1kõ1li1nast.
.rat1sa1kul1le1riga.
.har1ju1mus1pä1rase.
.vae1vu1mär1ga1tava.
.lam1ba1nah1ka1dele.
.ümber1kaud1se1tes.
.tuu1ni1ka1käi1sest.
.ette1vaat1li1kult.
.unel1ma1pu1de1lite.
.vahe1tus1kau1baga.
.vaba1taht1li1kult.
.selts1kond1li1kel.
.loot1si1ku1ni1rust.
.kih1la1sõr1mu1sest.
.taga1si1nõud1mine.
.kõik1või1ma1li1kud.
.läbi1paist1va1tes.
.küla1lis1lah1keid.
.vae1vu1ta1ba1ta1vat.
.Ette1vaat1li1kult.
.pee1gel1saa1li1des.
.kuld1epo1let1tide.
.vahe1tus1kau1baks.
.kül1ma1vee1tünni.
.vara1ke1va1disse.
.meri1rat1su1dega.
.kau1ba1saa1de1tis.
.vae1vu1kuul1dava.
.sula1tus1ah1jude.
.unel1ma1pu1de1lid.
.klaas1pii1ga1del.
.los1si1pii1gadki.
.märat1se1mi1sele.
.tuu1le1tõm1bu1sel.
.taga1si1hoid1lik.
.pärast1lõu1naks.
.vas1tu1võ1tu1ruum.
.jul1gu1se1raa1sud.
.nae1ru1joon1test.
.küün1la1val1guse.
.mere1hõn1gu1lise.
.lin1na1ko1da1nike.
.soo1la1seen1test.
.kodu1sa1da1masse.
.päi1ke1se1lõõ1sas.
.vaa1ri1ka1pu1nase.
.kui1va1silm1seid.
.saat1jas1kon1nal.
.ene1se1kind1lust.
.sül1le1kuk1ku1nud.
.later1na1val1gus.
.kure1kluuk1sete.
.valit1se1ja1test.
.selts1kond1liku.
.sil1ma1pilk1selt.
.Kok1ku1jooks1nud.
.tol1mu1kü1be1meid.
.vas1tu1pi1da1vaks.
.Tee1ni1ja1hin1ged.
.loo1dus1näh1tuse.
.öösär1gi1ser1vas.
.vahet1pi1da1mata.
.april1li1öödest.
.det1semb1ri1lumi.
.los1si1vä1ra1vast.
.otsu1se1kind1lus.
.hert1so1gi1tütre.
.lii1va1pa1be1riga.
.õukon1na1haldja.
.kunin1ga1paa1rid.
.kunin1ga1lin1nas.
.graat1sia1va1rud.
.mõt1te1lis1tesse.
.häda1va1ja1li1kud.
.viiu1li1muu1sika.
.kibes1tu1mu1sest.
.jär1je1kord1sest.
.põran1da1rii1ded.
.mõju1võim1sa1mat.
.Kan1na1ta1ma1tult.
.poi1si1ke1se1töid.
.har1ju1mus1tesse.
.vara1kamb1risse.
.meist1ri1me1helt.
.krii1di1poi1sile.
.val1gus1trii1bud.
.õuna1poo1li1kuid.
.vigur1da1mi1sega.
.mee1le1kind1lalt.
.kohal1vii1bi1jad.
.koo1li1kaas1lase.
.sil1ma1vaa1tesse.
.apteek1ri1mõõtu.
.vürs1ti1rii1kide.
.akna1luu1ki1dest.
.päe1va1tee1konna.
.mil1le1gi1pä1rast.
.uudis1hi1mut1ses.
.maga1ma1jää1mist.
.sel1gi1tus1tööst.
.pool1gaa1si1list.
.veran1da1tre1pil.
.sini1lil1le1dest.
.läbi1paist1vaid.
.kur1bu1se1vär1vid.
.vas1tu1meel1sust.
.hert1so1gi1tü1tar.
.sõna1kuul1ma1tut.
.kam1mer1teen1rid.
.tee1kaas1la1seks.
.sil1ma1nä1ge1mine.
.tühi1se1ma1telgi.
.saat1ja1daa1miks.
.Ele1van1di1luust.
.enne1nä1ge1ma1tud.
.saat1ja1daa1mide.
.läbi1paist1vail.
.lähi1kond1la1sed.
.nõu1de1pe1si1jast.
.klaa1si1pühk1med.
.kul1ler1kup1pude.
.graat1si1li1selt.
.muret1se1mi1seks.
.häs1ti1pei1de1tud.
.võlu1jõu1kü1beme.
.eksi1rän1na1kute.
.käte1pe1su1vette.
.prob1lee1mi1dega.
.kuk1la1juuk1seid.
.sula1tus1ah1juks.
.toi1me1tus1tesse.
.ette1võt1mi1sest.
.põran1da1pe1sust.
.tre1pi1ma1de1melt.
.silm1näh1ta1valt.
.kunin1ga1tüt1red.
.heit1lik1ku1sest.
.kal1da1jär1sa1kul.
.hiig1las1li1kust.
.ala1tead1li1kult.
.kunin1ga1ko1jale.
.kam1mer1neit1sid.
.pär1ja1kul1la1tis.
.pak1ke1kas1ti1des.
.taga1kiu1sa1mise.
.filig1raan1seid.
.kahet1se1mi1seks.
.keva1de1ootusse.
.tee1ni1ja1hin1ged.
.või1du1rõõm1salt.
.salon1gi1õh1tuid.
.ole1mas1ole1vaks.
.vers1ta1pos1tiks.
.väl1gu1ta1ba1must.
.abi1el1lu1mis1eas.
.lii1va1sa1hi1nas.
.sadu1la1tas1kus.
.tun1nus1tä1heks.
.vara1hom1mi1kul.
.joob1nus1ta1vas.
.lah1jen1da1mata.
.tee1ni1ja1hingi.
.une1hin1ga1mist.
.luge1ma1tu1test.
.tuli1vi1ha1seks.
.õhtu1poo1li1kul.
.veen1mis1jõuga.
.poo1le1aas1tast.
.ramp1vä1si1muse.
.kivi1põ1ran1dal.
.vesi1ämb1li1kud.
.klaa1si1pu1huja.
.Kivi1sil1lu1tis.
.print1ses1sile.
.klaa1si1ko1jani.
.hai1get1saa1nud.
.nel1ja1aas1tase.
.jär1je1kord1set.
.kait1se1mär1gid.
.tant1su1kaa1red.
.tee1ni1ja1hinge.
.April1li1öödel.
.aas1ta1küm1neid.
.troo1ni1pä1rija.
.lai1ne1säb1ruga.
.met1sa1tuk1kade.
.Pon1sar1di1niga.
.kui1da1gi1moodi.
.keld1ri1võt1med.
.asja1osa1li1sed.
.võõ1ris1ta1valt.
.Ära1tram1bi1tud.
.ligu1ne1mi1sest.
.üle1mi1ne1ku1aeg.
.plat1si1ke1selt.
.mõis1ta1tus1lik.
.pee1gel1da1vaid.
.tege1vu1se1tult.
.kan1nat1lik1kus.
.hele1val1gesse.
.voo1di1rii1deid.
.hele1tu1li1seks.
.une1koh1me1tute.
.hert1so1gin1nal.
.eel1ni1me1ta1tud.
.ene1se1tead1vus.
.mee1le1hei1test.
.ümb1rit1se1vaid.
.Print1ses1sile.
.käe1ula1tu1sest.
.tüd1ru1ku1narts.
.pee1si1ta1va1tel.
.kibe1kii1resti.
.sünd1su1se1tult.
.kaht1lu1se1vari.
.jutu1kaas1lane.
.naa1ber1kü1last.
.män1gu1kan1nist.
.küh1vel1da1nuks.
.hül1ge1ras1vaga.
.vas1tas1ti1kuse.
.auru1kat1lasse.
.print1ses1sist.
.igat1se1va1malt.
.kunin1ga1poega.
.ker1gen1du1sest.
.krii1mus1ta1tud.
.täi1de1vii1mine.
.nõe1la1pis1teid.
.tal1ve1va1ru1sid.
.paraad1us1test.
.häm1mel1du1nult.
.kahek1sa1teist.
.kar1gu1se1sammu.
.los1si1tor1nide.
.kal1da1pii1rile.
.täht1su1se1tult.
.hin1ge1tõm1beid.
.kum1ma1lis1test.
.sala1dus1katte.
.elus1olen1deid.
.kilo1meet1rite.
.suu1re1meel1sem.
.süda1me1täiega.
.klaas1tüd1ruku.
.hele1da1silmne.
.vas1tas1ti1kune.
.vaa1te1väl1jast.
.muns1ter1da1nud.
.tant1su1kaardi.
.tütar1lap1sega.
.val1si1tak1tist.
.loo1dus1li1kult.
.akva1ma1rii1nid.
.sil1ma1moon1dus.
.müü1ri1ser1vale.
.aka1dee1mi1line.
.tõe1näo1su1sega.
.mus1ti1ka1karva.
.klaa1si1pu1runa.
.klaa1si1kil1lud.
.päi1ke1se1kiiri.
.põue1tas1kusse.
.joo1nis1ta1mise.
.elu1suu1ru1seid.
.järel1mõt1tena.
.häm1mas1ta1vaid.
.mono1toon1sest.
.kunin1ga1linna.
.vil1ja1puu1aiad.
.sär1gi1pe1si1jat.
.Vaa1te1pil1diga.
.kih1la1kin1giks.
.häs1ti1si1hi1tud.
.katu1se1ak1nast.
.küü1nar1nu1kiga.
.nar1men1da1vast.
.päe1va1val1gust.
.kulu1põ1len1gud.
.fan1tas1ti1lise.
.kau1nis1tu1seks.
.minia1tuur1sed.
.kor1ral1da1tama.
.guver1nan1tide.
.sada1ma1lin1nas.
.pur1gi1põh1jast.
.kuue1tas1kusse.
.vahu1här1ma1sed.
.kas1te1til1kade.
.pruu1li1ja1lesk.
.kunin1gan1naga.
.klei1di1sleppi.
.tume1da1juusne.
.kam1mer1neitsi.
.pala1vi1ku1kuma.
.näpu1ots1tesse.
.Näda1la1päe1vad.
.süda1tal1vi1sel.
.van1gi1tor1nist.
.mesi1las1sü1lem.
.Aas1ta1küm1neid.
.kae1vu1võt1meid.
.iga1päe1va1seks.
.ohtu1de1rik1kad.
.koda1kond1sete.
.saa1pa1vik1sist.
.kuning1rii1gis.
.kes1ken1du1mine.
.mere1rat1su1sid.
.ette1juh1tu1vas.
.eksi1rän1na1kul.
.vas1tu1võt1mise.
.hin1ge1lis1teta.
.Troo1ni1saa1lis.
.kii1rus1ta1mata.
.see1li1ku1sa1bad.
.toa1tüd1ru1kute.
.haja1meel1selt.
.koi1ku1ser1vale.
.see1li1ku1sa1bas.
.los1si1rah1valt.
.üle1jää1nu1tega.
.Smu1gel1da1tigi.
.hilis1lõu1nane.
.lui1te1har1jalt.
.maja1nur1ka1des.
.pärast1lõu1nal.
.bal1li1saa1list.
.veti1ka1si1nine.
.laa1da1päe1valt.
.veen1mis1järje.
.tuu1le1tõm1bust.
.kunin1ga1pe1rel.
.otsi1rän1na1kud.
.vära1va1poo1led.
.kin1ni1tus1test.
.Läbi1paist1vas.
.aru1saa1ma1tuks.
.lap1se1suu1rust.
.kohus1tus1test.
.äsja1puh1ke1nud.
.iga1su1gus1test.
.kaa1sas1ole1vat.
.Ränd1võ1lu1rite.
.hom1mi1ku1kleit.
.iroo1ni1li1selt.
.umb1usk1li1kult.
.rüüt1li1preili.
.mäles1tus1teta.
.voo1di1ser1vale.
.väl1ja1va1li1tut.
.õhtu1päi1ke1ses.
.maru1vi1ha1seks.
.roka1sei1madki.
.ootus1äre1vust.
.pit1si1va1hu1ses.
.öösär1gi1paelu.
.sil1ma1pil1guga.
.nar1men1da1vate.
.küü1ne1mus1tagi.
.maga1mis1toast.
.para1ta1ma1tult.
.kunin1ga1po1jal.
.noor1pe1re1mehe.
.külas1käi1kude.
.kunin1ga1po1jad.
.üles1tõs1te1tud.
.lap1se1põl1vest.
.manit1sus1tega.
.ilm1tin1gi1mata.
.Kunin1ga1po1jad.
.ime1pä1ras1test.
.ämb1li1ku1võrke.
.maga1mis1tuppa.
.rii1gi1nõu1kogu.
.voo1di1peat1sis.
.hea1taht1li1kus.
.tant1sisk1leva.
.üle1voo1la1vast.
.lin1nu1luu1dega.
.väär1tus1likku.
.kõver1peeg1lis.
.üks1meel1selt.
.unis1tus1tega.
.pääst1mi1sest.
.kuue1re1vääri.
.Jää1si1ni1seks.
.pär1li1krooni.
.küsi1mus1test.
.suu1re1meelne.
.val1va1mi1sest.
.ette1vaat1lik.
.kal1ju1lõ1hede.
.hin1ge1õe1lust.
.sil1lu1ti1selt.
.tar1du1mu1sest.
.kar1tu1li1test.
.kii1rus1ta1des.
.sei1su1ko1hast.
.pool1ir1va1kil.
.olu1li1se1maks.
.lõp1pe1ma1tuna.
.õue1vä1ra1vast.
.vei1di1ke1seks.
.sula1tus1ahju.
.sekun1di1tega.
.här1ras1rahva.
.vih1ma1pii1sad.
.vahe1tus1laps.
.häi1ri1ma1tult.
.lah1ti1kis1tud.
.kriit1me1hele.
.tasan1di1kele.
.rul1lu1va1tele.
.saa1re1lad1vas.
.mesi1las1pere.
.tee1ni1jan1nad.
.sel1ja1rii1ded.
.ähvar1da1valt.
.klaas1pii1gat.
.April1li1ööle.
.paa1di1sil1lal.
.une1se1ga1selt.
.kolm1vee1rand.
.tõl1la1kuu1ris.
.Pee1gel1du1sed.
.mere1lin1dude.
.vih1ma1mär1jad.
.Sel1le1pä1rast.
.vaa1te1väl1jas.
.kan1na1ta1matu.
.ootus1rik1kad.
.prak1ti1liste.
.ärk1vel1oleku.
.kan1nu1poi1sil.
